Washington statutes.
RCW 18.106.280

Pilot project—Enforcement of chapter—Reimbursement fee.

The department of labor and industries may establish one pilot project in which the department will enter into an agreement with a city and the county within which the city is located regarding compliance inspections by the city or county to enforce this chapter. Under the terms of the agreement, the city and county shall be permitted to submit declarations of noncompliance to the department for the department's enforcement under RCW 18.106.180, with reimbursement to the city or county at an established fee. The pilot project shall be located in eastern Washington.

[ 1995 c 294 s 1; 1994 c 174 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 174: See note following RCW 18.106.020.